Idaho, session 2025, H0285.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 18-8101, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
18-8101. PURPOSE. The legislature recognizes the constitutional
right of every citizen to peaceably assemble and petition the government
for redress of grievances, to harbor and express beliefs on any subject, to
associate with others who share similar beliefs, and to keep and bear arms.
It is not the intent, by the provisions of this chapter, to interfere with the
exercise of any and all rights protected by the constitutions of the state
of Idaho or the United States. The legislature further recognizes and finds
that conspiracies and training activities in furtherance of unlawful acts of
terrorism and violence against persons and property is not constitutionally
protected, poses a threat to public order and safety, and should be subject
to criminal sanctions.
SECTION 2. That Section 18-8102, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
18-8102. DEFINITIONS. As used in this chapter:
(1) "Civil disorder" means any public disturbance involving acts of vi-
olence by an assemblage of two (2) or more persons which acts cause an imme-
diate danger of or result in damage or injury to the property or person of any
other individual.
(2) "Domestic terrorism" means activities conducted within or that
take effect within the geographical boundaries of the state of Idaho that:
(a) Constitute a felony offense under Idaho law; and
(b) Either:
(i) Involve violent acts or threats specifically intended to
physically harm human life and:
1. Intimidate, coerce, influence, or disrupt other lawful
activities within Idaho; or


2. Influence the policy of the state of Idaho or any politi-
cal subdivision thereof; or
(ii) Involve use of weapons of mass destruction as defined in sec-
tion 18-3322, Idaho Code.
(3) "Domestic terrorist" means a person who pleads guilty to or is found
guilty of domestic terrorism as defined in this section.
(2) (4) "Governmental military force" means the national guard, as de-
fined in section 101(9) of title 10, United States Code 10 U.S.C. 101(c)(1);
the organized militia of any state or territory of the United States, the
Commonwealth of Puerto Rico, or the District of Columbia, not included with
the definition of national guard as defined by such section 101(9) 10 U.S.C.
101(c)(1); and the armed forces of the United States.
(3) (5) "Law enforcement agency" means a governmental unit of one (1) or
more persons employed full-time or part-time by the state or federal govern-
ment, or a political subdivision thereof, for the purpose of preventing and
detecting crime and enforcing laws or local ordinances and the employees of
which are authorized to make arrests for crimes while acting within the scope
of their authority.
(4) (6) "Peace officer" means any duly appointed officer of a law en-
forcement agency as defined herein, including, but not limited to, an of-
ficer of the Idaho state police, department of fish and game, a sheriff or
deputy sheriff of a county, or a marshal or police officer of a city.
(5) (7) "Terrorism" means activities that:
(a) Are a violation of Idaho criminal law within the geographical
boundaries of the state of Idaho; and
(b) Either:
(i) Involve violent acts dangerous to or threats specifically in-
tended to physically harm human life that are intended to and:
(i) 1. Intimidate or, coerce a civilian population, influ-
ence, or disrupt other lawful activities outside the state
of Idaho; or
(ii) 2. Influence the policy of a government by intimidation
or coercion any jurisdiction of the United States or any po-
litical subdivision thereof; or
(iii) (ii) Affect the conduct of a government by Involve the use of
weapons of mass destruction, as defined in section 18-3322, Idaho
Code.
(8) "Terrorist" means a person who pleads guilty to or is found guilty
of terrorism as defined in this section.
SECTION 3. That Section 18-8103, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
18-8103. PROHIBITED ACTIVITIES -- PENALTIES. Any person who:
(1) Conspires with one (1) or more persons to injure, oppress, threaten
or intimidate any citizen in the free exercise or enjoyment of any right or
privilege secured to him by the constitutions or laws of the United States or
the state of Idaho, by the use of violence against the person or property of
such citizen; or
(2) Goes on the highway, or on the premises of any citizen, with one (1)
or more other persons, with the intent by use of violence against such cit-


izen or his property, to prevent or hinder his free exercise or enjoyment of
any right or privilege so secured; or
(3) Assembles with one (1) or more persons for the purpose of training
or instructing in the use of, or practicing with, any technique or means ca-
pable of causing property damage, bodily injury or death with the intent to
employ such training, instruction or practice in the commission of a civil
disorder or domestic terrorism, as defined herein in this chapter; or
(4) Commits an act of terrorism or domestic terrorism, as defined in
this chapter; or
(5) Conspires with one (1) or more persons to commit an act of terrorism
or domestic terrorism, as defined in this chapter;
shall be guilty of a felony. A violation of subsection (1), (2) or (3) of this
section shall be punished by imprisonment in the state prison for a period
not to exceed ten (10) years, by a fine not in excess of fifty thousand dol-
lars ($50,000), or by both such fine and imprisonment. A violation of sub-
section (4) or (5) of this section shall be punished by imprisonment in the
state prison for a period of up to and including life imprisonment or by a
fine not exceeding fifty thousand dollars ($50,000), or by both.
SECTION 4. That Section 18-8106, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
18-8106. PROVIDING MATERIAL SUPPORT TO TERRORISTS OR DOMESTIC TER-
RORISTS. (1) A person who provides material support or resources, or who
conceals or disguises the nature, location, source or ownership of material
support or resources, with the knowledge and intention that such support or
resources are to be used in the preparation or carrying out of a violation
of this chapter, or in the preparation or carrying out of the concealment of
such support or resources, or in the escape from the commission of any such
violation, shall be guilty of a felony and shall be punished by imprisonment
in the state prison for a period not to exceed fifteen (15) years or by a fine
not exceeding fifty thousand dollars ($50,000), or by both.
(2) As used in this section, the term "material support or resources"
means currency or other financial securities, financial services, lodging,
safe houses, training, false documentation or identification, communica-
tions equipment, facilities, weapons, lethal substances, explosives, per-
sonnel, transportation, and other physical assets. "Material support or re-
sources" does not include medical or religious material.
SECTION 5. That Section 18-4003, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
18-4003. DEGREES OF MURDER. (a) All murder which is perpetrated by
means of poison, or lying in wait, or torture, when torture is inflicted with
the intent to cause suffering, to execute vengeance, to extort something
from the victim, or to satisfy some sadistic inclination, or which is per-
petrated by any kind of willful, deliberate and premeditated killing, is
murder of the first degree.
(b) Any murder of any peace officer, executive officer, officer of the
court, fireman, judicial officer or prosecuting attorney who was acting in
the lawful discharge of an official duty, and was known or should have been


known by the perpetrator of the murder to be an officer so acting, shall be
murder of the first degree.
(c) Any murder committed by a person under a sentence for murder of the
first or second degree, including such persons on parole or probation from
such sentence, shall be murder of the first degree.
(d) Any murder committed in the perpetration of, or attempt to perpe-
trate, aggravated battery on a child under twelve (12) years of age, arson,
rape, robbery, burglary, kidnapping or mayhem, or an act of terrorism or do-
mestic terrorism, as defined in section 18-8102, Idaho Code, or the use of a
weapon of mass destruction, biological weapon or chemical weapon, is murder
of the first degree.
(e) Any murder committed by a person incarcerated in a penal institu-
tion upon a person employed by the penal institution, another inmate of the
penal institution or a visitor to the penal institution shall be murder of
the first degree.
(f) Any murder committed by a person while escaping or attempting to es-
cape from a penal institution is murder of the first degree.
(g) All other kinds of murder are of the second degree.
SECTION 6. That Section 19-401, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
19-401. NO STATUTE OF LIMITATIONS FOR CERTAIN FELONIES. Notwithstand-
ing any other provision of law, there is no limitation of time within which a
prosecution for the following crimes must be commenced:
(1) Murder;
(2) Voluntary manslaughter;
(3) Rape pursuant to section 18-6101(3) through (10), Idaho Code;
(4) Sexual abuse of a child or lewd conduct with a child as set forth in
sections 18-1506 and 18-1508, Idaho Code; or
(5) An act of terrorism or domestic terrorism as set forth in sections
18-8102, 18-8103, 18-3322, 18-3323 and 18-3324, Idaho Code.
SECTION 7. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.